California, session 20252026, SB323.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 69508.5 of the Education Code is amended to read:69508.5. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, a student who meets the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 68130.5, or who meets equivalent requirements adopted by the Regents of the University of California, is eligible to apply for, and participate in, any student financial aid program administered by the State of California to the full extent permitted by federal law. The Legislature finds and declares that this section is a state law within the meaning of Section 1621(d) of Title 8 of the United States Code.(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the commission shall establish procedures and forms that enable students who are exempt from paying nonresident tuition under Section 68130.5, or who meet equivalent requirements adopted by the regents, to apply for, and participate in, all student financial aid programs administered by the State of California to the full extent permitted by federal law.(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that all forms of state-based aid in California be made equally available to students who are exempt, pursuant to Section 68130.5, from paying nonresident tuition and to all other students who qualify for state-based aid in this state.(d) By the start of the 2026–27 financial aid cycle, the commission shall amend the California Dream Act application, and any of its grant processing systems, to clarify and ensure that the application can be used by any student eligible for state financial aid programs, regardless of their eligibility for federal financial aid.(e) The commission shall consult with the segments of postsecondary education in promoting California’s public and private colleges and universities to promote the California Dream Act application in a manner that maximizes the amount of federal aid that students may access while also apprising students of the choices available regarding which application they and their families may use. effectively, including supporting measures to maximize student attainment of federal financial aid, where appropriate, while also clearly informing students and their families of their available application options.(f) The commission shall inform students and their families of their available financial aid application options, including, but not limited to, by doing both of the following:(1) Listing, in a prominent manner, on the commission’s internet website and the California Dream Act application, the application eligibility criteria for the California Dream Act application, the types of financial aid that each application will consider, and key distinctions between the applications.(2) Ensuring that applicants actively acknowledge, before completing the California Dream Act application, that they will not be considered for any federal student financial aid programs.